Hawaii statutes.
§514E-10 Registration required; developer,
acquisition agent, plan manager, and exchange agent; registration renewal.
(a) A developer shall not offer or dispose of a time share unit or a time
share interest unless the disclosure statement required by section 514E-9 is
filed with the director pursuant to the time specified in this chapter, or the
development is exempt from filing, and the time share plan to be offered by the
developer is accepted by the director for registration under this chapter. The
director shall not accept a developer's time share plan if the developer does
not possess a history of honesty, truthfulness, financial integrity, and fair
dealing.

(b) An acquisition agent (including the
developer if it is also the acquisition agent) shall register under this
chapter by filing with the director a statement setting forth the time sharing
plan for which it is providing prospective purchasers, its address, the
telephone number, other information required by the director as provided by rules
adopted pursuant to chapter 91, and, if the acquisition agent is not a natural
person, the name of the responsible managing employee; provided that an
acquisition agent licensed under chapter 467 as a real estate broker shall not
be required to register under this chapter. All acquisition agents not
licensed under chapter 467 shall be approved by the director. The director
shall not approve any acquisition agent who is not of good character and who
does not possess a reputation for honesty, truthfulness, and fair dealing. The
acquisition agent shall furnish evidence that the acquisition agent is bonded
as required by rules adopted by the director pursuant to chapter 91 to cover
any violation by the acquisition agent of any solicitation ordinance or other
regulation governing the use of the premise or premises in which the time share
plan is promoted; provided that the acquisition agent shall be separately
bonded for each time share plan for which it is providing prospective
purchases.

(c) A plan manager (including the developer if
it is also the plan manager) shall register under this chapter by filing with
the director a statement setting forth the time sharing plan that it is
managing, its principal office address, telephone number, and responsible managing
employee. The plan manager shall furnish evidence that the plan manager is
bonded as required by rules adopted by the director pursuant to chapter 91 to
cover any default of the plan manager and any of its employees of their duties
and responsibilities; provided that the plan manager shall be separately bonded
for each time share plan under the management of the plan manager.

(d) An exchange agent (including the developer
if it is also an exchange agent) shall register under this chapter by filing with
the director a statement setting forth the time sharing plan for which it is
offering exchange services, its principal office address and telephone number,
and designate its responsible managing employee.

(e) Any plan manager or developer registration
required in this section shall be renewed by December 31 of each even-numbered
year, and any acquisition agent or exchange agent registration required in this
section shall be renewed on December 31 of each odd-numbered year; provided
that this subsection shall not relieve the person required to register from the
obligation to notify the director promptly of any material change in any
information submitted to the director, nor shall it relieve the developer of
its obligation to promptly file amendments or supplements to the disclosure
statement, and to promptly supply the amendments or supplements to purchasers
of time share interests.

(f) An application for renewal of a developer
registration shall be on a form prescribed by the director and shall include:

(1) A current disclosure statement that meets the
requirements of section 514E-9 and section 16-106-3, Hawaii Administrative
Rules, if not already on file;

(2) A statement that is certified by the developer to
be true and correct in all respects and that identifies, as appropriate:

(A) The time share units in the time share
plan registered pursuant to this chapter; the total number of time share
interests registered for sale in each unit pursuant to this chapter; and the
total number of time share interests that have not yet been sold as of the date
specified in the developer's certification, which date shall not be more than
sixty days prior to the date of the developer's certification; or

(B) The property in the time share plan
registered pursuant to this chapter; the total number of points registered for
sale in each property pursuant to this chapter; and the total number of points
in the time share plan that have not yet been sold as of the date specified in
the developer's certification, which date shall not be more than sixty days
prior to the date of the developer's certification;

(3) If the developer is a corporation, partnership,
joint venture, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership, an
original certificate of good standing issued by the business registration
division of the department of commerce and consumer affairs not more than
forty-five days before the date of submission of the renewal application; and

(4) The biennial renewal fee.

(g) Developers shall not be required to
include the following in an application for renewal of a developer registration
of a time share plan:

(1) A financial statement of the developer; or

(2) A policy of title insurance, a preliminary title
report, abstract of title, or certificate of title on the units or time share
interests in the time share plan. [L 1980, c 186, pt of §1; am L 1981, c 81,
§5; am L 1984, c 41, §4; am L 1985, c 114, §1 superseded by c 145, §1; gen ch
1985; am L 1987, c 60, §1; am L 1989, c 217, §2; am L 1994, c 91, §1; am L
2001, c 27, §1; am L 2014, c 228, §3]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next